apertium-ltz.ltz.dix
<pardef n="W/aasser__n_nt_lower">
  <e>       <p><l>aasser</l>    <r>aasser<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ässer</l>     <r>aasser<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aassere</l>   <r>aasser<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="n"/><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="W/and__n_m">
  <e>       <p><l>and</l>       <r>and<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="cmp-L"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ënn</l>       <r>and<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="W/and__n_m_lower">
  <e>       <p><l>and</l>       <r>and<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ënn</l>       <r>and<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="W/ollef__n_m">
  <e>       <p><l>ollef</l>     <r>ollef<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ëllef</l>     <r>ollef<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="W/ollef__n_m_lower">
  <e>       <p><l>ollef</l>     <r>ollef<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ëllef</l>     <r>ollef<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="We/e__n_m">
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eër</l>       <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="We/e__n_m_lower">
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eër</l>       <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="Z/ap__n_m">
  <e>       <p><l>ap</l>        <r>ap<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>äpp</l>       <r>ap<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Z/ap__n_m_lower">
  <e>       <p><l>ap</l>        <r>ap<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>äpp</l>       <r>ap<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="Zo/oss__n_f">
  <e>       <p><l>oss</l>       <r>oss<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>se</l>        <r>oss<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Zo/oss__n_f_lower">
  <e>       <p><l>oss</l>       <r>oss<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>se</l>        <r>oss<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="n"/><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="CANDIDATE-eng-xxx__n_f">    <!-- paradigm for unchecked n.f-candidates (~ capitalized words preceded by eng) from a wikipedia corpus -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<!-- SECTION: Proper nouns -->

<pardef n="Frankräich__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="Peter__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="Maria__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="Schmidt__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<!-- SECTION: Abbreviations -->

<pardef n="Abk.__abbr">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="abbr"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
  </pardefs>

<e lm="Waasser">         <i>w</i><par n="W/aasser__n_nt_lower"/></e>
<e lm="Wand">            <i>W</i><par n="W/and__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="Wand">            <i>w</i><par n="W/and__n_m_lower"/></e>
<e lm="Wee">             <i>We</i><par n="We/e__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="Wee">             <i>we</i><par n="We/e__n_m_lower"/></e>
<e lm="Wollef">          <i>W</i><par n="W/ollef__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="Wollef">          <i>w</i><par n="W/ollef__n_m_lower"/></e>
<e lm="Zap">             <i>Z</i><par n="Z/ap__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="Zap">             <i>z</i><par n="Z/ap__n_m_lower"/></e>
<e lm="Zooss">           <i>Zo</i><par n="Zo/oss__n_f"/></e>
<e lm="Zooss">           <i>zo</i><par n="Zo/oss__n_f_lower"/></e>
<e lm="Baachfrell">      <i>Baachfrell</i><par n="CANDIDATE-eng-xxx__n_f"/></e>
<e lm="Box">             <i>Box</i><par n="CANDIDATE-eng-xxx__n_f"/></e>
<e lm="Demenz">          <i>Demenz</i><par n="CANDIDATE-eng-xxx__n_f"/></e>
<e lm="Eisespléckerei">  <i>Eisespléckerei</i><par n="CANDIDATE-eng-xxx__n_f"/></e>
<e lm="Feelermarge">     <i>Feelermarge</i><par n="CANDIDATE-eng-xxx__n_f"/></e>
<e lm="Gebietsplaz">     <i>Gebietsplaz</i><par n="CANDIDATE-eng-xxx__n_f"/></e>
<e lm="Halekierch">      <i>Halekierch</i><par n="CANDIDATE-eng-xxx__n_f"/></e>
<e lm="Internetstuff">   <i>Internetstuff</i><par n="CANDIDATE-eng-xxx__n_f"/></e>
<e lm="Klassifikatioun"> <i>Klassifikatioun</i><par n="CANDIDATE-eng-xxx__n_f"/></e>
<e lm="Landmass">        <i>Landmass</i><par n="CANDIDATE-eng-xxx__n_f"/></e>
<e lm="Mënschemass">     <i>Mënschemass</i><par n="CANDIDATE-eng-xxx__n_f"/></e>
<e lm="Niewestreck">     <i>Niewestreck</i><par n="CANDIDATE-eng-xxx__n_f"/></e>
<e lm="Parzeläinsfabrik"><i>Parzeläinsfabrik</i><par n="CANDIDATE-eng-xxx__n_f"/></e>
<e lm="Pseudowëssenschaft"><i>Pseudowëssenschaft</i><par n="CANDIDATE-eng-xxx__n_f"/></e>
<e lm="Rockgrupp">       <i>Rockgrupp</i><par n="CANDIDATE-eng-xxx__n_f"/></e>
<e lm="Séimeil">         <i>Séimeil</i><par n="CANDIDATE-eng-xxx__n_f"/></e>
<e lm="Steekoll">        <i>Steekoll</i><par n="CANDIDATE-eng-xxx__n_f"/></e>
<e lm="Transformatioun"> <i>Transformatioun</i><par n="CANDIDATE-eng-xxx__n_f"/></e>
<e lm="Wunnplaz">        <i>Wunnplaz</i><par n="CANDIDATE-eng-xxx__n_f"/></e>
<e lm="Aleixandre">      <i>Aleixandre</i><par n="Peter__np"/></e>
<e lm="Anthony">         <i>Anthony</i><par n="Peter__np"/></e>
<e lm="Bastian">         <i>Bastian</i><par n="Peter__np"/></e>
<e lm="Bret">            <i>Bret</i><par n="Peter__np"/></e>
<e lm="Charlie">         <i>Charlie</i><par n="Peter__np"/></e>
<e lm="Conrad">          <i>Conrad</i><par n="Peter__np"/></e>
<e lm="Denis">           <i>Denis</i><par n="Peter__np"/></e>
<e lm="Douglas">         <i>Douglas</i><par n="Peter__np"/></e>
<e lm="Frances">         <i>Frances</i><par n="Peter__np"/></e>
<e lm="Giuseppe">        <i>Giuseppe</i><par n="Peter__np"/></e>
<e lm="Ian">             <i>Ian</i><par n="Peter__np"/></e>
<e lm="Jimy">            <i>Jimy</i><par n="Peter__np"/></e>
<e lm="Kevin">           <i>Kevin</i><par n="Peter__np"/></e>
<e lm="Luigi">           <i>Luigi</i><par n="Peter__np"/></e>
<e lm="Napoleon">        <i>Napoleon</i><par n="Peter__np"/></e>
<e lm="Pierre">          <i>Pierre</i><par n="Peter__np"/></e>
<e lm="Salma">           <i>Salma</i><par n="Peter__np"/></e>
<e lm="Teddy">           <i>Teddy</i><par n="Peter__np"/></e>
<e lm="Willy">           <i>Willy</i><par n="Peter__np"/></e>
<e lm="Alexandrea">      <i>Alexandrea</i><par n="Maria__np"/></e>
<e lm="Angelika">        <i>Angelika</i><par n="Maria__np"/></e>
<e lm="Anrie">           <i>Anrie</i><par n="Maria__np"/></e>
<e lm="Basilisa">        <i>Basilisa</i><par n="Maria__np"/></e>
<e lm="Carrie">          <i>Carrie</i><par n="Maria__np"/></e>
<e lm="Colleen">         <i>Colleen</i><par n="Maria__np"/></e>
<e lm="Dolly">           <i>Dolly</i><par n="Maria__np"/></e>
<e lm="Evelyn">          <i>Evelyn</i><par n="Maria__np"/></e>
<e lm="Gioffreda">       <i>Gioffreda</i><par n="Maria__np"/></e>
<e lm="Ignolinda">       <i>Ignolinda</i><par n="Maria__np"/></e>
<e lm="Jill">            <i>Jill</i><par n="Maria__np"/></e>
<e lm="Kimberly">        <i>Kimberly</i><par n="Maria__np"/></e>
<e lm="Lucy">            <i>Lucy</i><par n="Maria__np"/></e>
<e lm="Marinella">       <i>Marinella</i><par n="Maria__np"/></e>
<e lm="Nathalie">        <i>Nathalie</i><par n="Maria__np"/></e>
<e lm="Raffaella">       <i>Raffaella</i><par n="Maria__np"/></e>
<e lm="Sarah">           <i>Sarah</i><par n="Maria__np"/></e>
<e lm="Tamara">          <i>Tamara</i><par n="Maria__np"/></e>
<e lm="Virginia">        <i>Virginia</i><par n="Maria__np"/></e>
<e lm="Auerbach">        <i>Auerbach</i><par n="Schmidt__np"/></e>
<e lm="Batts">           <i>Batts</i><par n="Schmidt__np"/></e>
<e lm="Bevans">          <i>Bevans</i><par n="Schmidt__np"/></e>
<e lm="Boyd">            <i>Boyd</i><par n="Schmidt__np"/></e>
<e lm="Carrey">          <i>Carrey</i><par n="Schmidt__np"/></e>
<e lm="Crunch">          <i>Crunch</i><par n="Schmidt__np"/></e>
<e lm="Duval">           <i>Duval</i><par n="Schmidt__np"/></e>
<e lm="Frusciante">      <i>Frusciante</i><par n="Schmidt__np"/></e>
<e lm="Hamilton">        <i>Hamilton</i><par n="Schmidt__np"/></e>
<e lm="Hurst">           <i>Hurst</i><par n="Schmidt__np"/></e>
<e lm="Lambert">         <i>Lambert</i><par n="Schmidt__np"/></e>
<e lm="Maloney">         <i>Maloney</i><par n="Schmidt__np"/></e>
<e lm="Milne">           <i>Milne</i><par n="Schmidt__np"/></e>
<e lm="Pacana">          <i>Pacana</i><par n="Schmidt__np"/></e>
<e lm="Rama">            <i>Rama</i><par n="Schmidt__np"/></e>
<e lm="Salvatore">       <i>Salvatore</i><par n="Schmidt__np"/></e>
<e lm="Spielberg">       <i>Spielberg</i><par n="Schmidt__np"/></e>
<e lm="Trenton">         <i>Trenton</i><par n="Schmidt__np"/></e>
<e lm="Williams">        <i>Williams</i><par n="Schmidt__np"/></e>
<e lm="Berlin">          <i>Berlin</i><par n="Frankräich__np"/></e>
<e lm="Däitschland">     <i>Däitschland</i><par n="Frankräich__np"/></e>
<e lm="England">         <i>England</i><par n="Frankräich__np"/></e>
<e lm="Europa">          <i>Europa</i><par n="Frankräich__np"/></e>
<e lm="Frankräich">      <i>Frankräich</i><par n="Frankräich__np"/></e>
<e lm="Holland">         <i>Holland</i><par n="Frankräich__np"/></e>
<e lm="Italien">         <i>Italien</i><par n="Frankräich__np"/></e>
<e lm="Lëtzebuerg">      <i>Lëtzebuerg</i><par n="Frankräich__np"/></e>
<e lm="London">          <i>London</i><par n="Frankräich__np"/></e>
<e lm="Loutrengen">      <i>Loutrengen</i><par n="Frankräich__np"/></e>
<e lm="Paräis">          <i>Paräis</i><par n="Frankräich__np"/></e>
<e lm="Roum">            <i>Roum</i><par n="Frankräich__np"/></e>
<e lm="Wien">            <i>Wien</i><par n="Frankräich__np"/></e>
<e lm="Chr.">            <i>Chr.</i><par n="Abk.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="v. Chr.">         <i>v.<b/>Chr.</i><par n="Abk.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="v.Chr.">          <i>v.Chr.</i><par n="Abk.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="z. B.">           <i>z.<b/>B.</i><par n="Abk.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="z.B.">            <i>z.B.</i><par n="Abk.__abbr"/></e>
